apertium-eng.eng.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

  <!-- Define the alphabet below. -->
  <alphabet>aAáÁăảạÆbBcCčdDÐeEéèễệfFgGhHiIíjJkKlLmMnNoOóöớpPqQrRsSšştTŢuUúüưvVwWxXyYzZ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <!-- Define symbol definitions within <sdef> here. -->
    <sdef n="n"               c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"              c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"           c="Verb, lexical"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"           c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"            c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"           c="'To be' verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"         c="'To have' verb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"          c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"          c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"          c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="pr"              c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adv"             c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="ij"              c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="adj"             c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="prn"             c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="v"               c="Verb"/>

    <sdef n="attr"            c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="top"             c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"             c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"             c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="org"             c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="al"              c="Altres / misc proper nouns"/>

    <sdef n="pers"            c="Personal pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ref"             c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="res"             c="Reciprocal pronoun"/>

    <sdef n="det"             c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="pos"             c="Possessive"/>

    <sdef n="p1"              c="1st person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"              c="2nd person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"              c="3rd person"/>

    <sdef n="nt"              c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="ut"              c="Utrum"/>
    <sdef n="f"               c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"               c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="un"              c="No gender"/>

    <sdef n="sg"              c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="du"              c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="pl"              c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"              c="Singular / plural"/>

    <sdef n="ind"             c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"             c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="nom"             c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"             c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"             c="Genitive"/>

    <sdef n="dem"             c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"             c="Question word / interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"             c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="neg"             c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="emph"            c="Emphatic"/>

    <sdef n="inf"             c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pres"            c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="imp"             c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pret"            c="Preterite"/>
    <sdef n="pp"              c="Perfect participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"            c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="pasv"            c="Passive"/>
    <sdef n="actv"            c="Active voice"/>
    <sdef n="prog"            c="Progressive"/>
    <sdef n="past"             c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="pstp"             c="Past participle"/>

    <sdef n="will"             c="Will Vaux"/>

    <sdef n="sint"            c="Synthetic (of adjectives)"/>
    <sdef n="pst"             c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"            c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"             c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="ord"             c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="acr"             c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="unc"             c="Uncountable"/>

    <sdef n="num"             c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sent"            c="Sentence end"/>
    <sdef n="cm"              c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="apos"            c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="guio"            c="Dash"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"            c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"            c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"           c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"           c="Right quote"/>

    <sdef n="compound-only-L" c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
    <sdef n="compound-R"      c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- Define paradigms within <pardef> here. -->
    <pardef n="numeral">
      <e><re>[0123456789]+</re></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="number">
      <e><par n="numeral"/><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- adjective pardefs -->
    <pardef n="beautiful__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ly</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- adverb pardefs -->
    <pardef n="every__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- auxilliary verb pardefs -->
    <pardef n="will__vaux">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="will"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- conjunction pardefs -->
    <pardef n="and__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- determiner pardefs -->
    <pardef n="/a__det">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>the</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- noun pardefs -->
    <pardef n="house__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fire__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fish__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/an__n">
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an's</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en's</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="child__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ren</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ren's</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wom/an__n">
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an's</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en's</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- preposition pardefs -->
    <pardef n="on__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- pronoun pardefs -->
    <pardef n="/I__prn">
      <e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>me</l><r>I<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mine</l><r>I<s n="prn"/><s n="gen"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>myself</l><r>I<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>my</l><r>I<s n="prn"/><s n="gen"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="you__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>r</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="gen"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rself</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rs</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="gen"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/e__prn">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="gen"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imself</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="angry"><i>angry</i><par n="beautiful__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="beautiful"><i>beautiful</i><par n="beautiful__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="clear"><i>clear</i><par n="beautiful__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tired"><i>tired</i><par n="beautiful__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="good"><i>good</i><par n="beautiful__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="later"><i>later</i><par n="every__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="yesterday"><i>yesterday</i><par n="every__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="now"><i>now</i><par n="every__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="not"><i>not</i><par n="every__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="every__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="yes"><i>yes</i><par n="every__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="how"><i>how</i><par n="every__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="many"><i>many</i><par n="every__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="will"><i>will</i><par n="will__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="and"><i>and</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="child"><i>child</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fire"><i>fire</i><par n="fire__n"/></e>
    <e lm="land"><i>land</i><par n="fire__n"/></e>
    <e lm="man"><i>m</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="police"><i>police</i><par n="fire__n"/></e>
    <e lm="visitor"><i>visitor</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="water"><i>water</i><par n="fire__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wind"><i>wind</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
    <e lm="woman"><i>woman</i><par n="wom/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="one"><i>one</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="two"><i>two</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="three"><i>three</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="four"><i>four</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="five"><i>five</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="six"><i>six</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="seven"><i>seven</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="eight"><i>eight</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="nine"><i>nine</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="ten"><i>ten</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="by"><i>by</i><par n="on__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="before"><i>before</i><par n="on__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i></i><par n="/I__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="you"><i>you</i><par n="you__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="he"><i>h</i><par n="h/e__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i></i><par n="/a__det"/></e>
    <e><par n="number"/></e>
      <e lm="where"><i>where</i><par n="every__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="why"><i>why</i><par n="every__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="rice"><i>rice</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
      <e lm="blood"><i>blood</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
      <e lm="left"><i>left</i><par n="on__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="inside"><i>inside</i><par n="on__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="twelve"><i>twelve</i><par n="numeral"/></e>
      <e lm="thirteen"><i>thirteen</i><par n="numeral"/></e>
      <e lm="fourteen"><i>fourteen</i><par n="numeral"/></e>
      <e lm="fifteen"><i>fifteen</i><par n="numeral"/></e>
      <e lm="seventeen"><i>seventeen</i><par n="numeral"/></e>
      <e lm="nineteen"><i>nineteen</i><par n="numeral"/></e>
      <e lm="thirty"><i>thirty</i><par n="numeral"/></e>
      <e lm="fifty"><i>fifty</i><par n="numeral"/></e>
      <e lm="seventy"><i>seventy</i><par n="numeral"/></e>
      <e lm="ninety"><i>ninety</i><par n="numeral"/></e>
      <e lm="today"><i>today</i><par n="on__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="spring"><i>spring</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
      <e lm="bread"><i>bread</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
      <e lm="oil"><i>oil</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
      <e lm="wheat"><i>wheat</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
      <e lm="pork"><i>pork</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
      <e lm="soil"><i>soil</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
      <e lm="silver"><i>silver</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
      <e lm="leather"><i>leather</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
      <e lm="silk"><i>silk</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
      <e lm="writer"><i>writer</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
      <e lm="then"><i>then</i><par n="on__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="nowhere"><i>nowhere</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
      <e lm="never"><i>never</i><par n="on__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="often"><i>often</i><par n="on__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="just"><i>just</i><par n="on__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="very"><i>very</i><par n="on__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="capacity"><i>capacity</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
      <e lm="decrease"><i>decrease</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
      <e lm="folk"><i>folk</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
      <e lm="lecture"><i>lecture</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
      <e lm="phrase"><i>phrase</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
